Wisconsin, session 2025, AB575.
do enact as follows:AB575,14Section 1. 995.80 of the statutes is created to read:AB575,1,65995.80 Use of facial recognition technology. (1) Definitions. In this 6section:AB575,2,27(a) “Facial recognition technology” means an automated system that takes 1from camera footage a digital image or video frame of an individual’s face and 2compares it against a database of faces in order to identify matches.AB575,2,63(b) “Local governmental unit” means a political subdivision of this state, a 4special purpose district in this state, an agency or corporation of a political 5subdivision or special purpose district, or a combination or subunit of any of the 6foregoing.AB575,2,97(c) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 8commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other body in state 9government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.AB575,2,1310(2) Prohibition. No state agency or local governmental unit may use facial 11recognition technology or data generated from facial recognition technology for any 12purpose except for identifying employees of the state agency or local governmental 13unit for purposes related to employment.AB575,2,1414